Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.305

Schools of medicine, dentistry, and related health services—Purpose.

The aim and purpose of the schools of medicine, dentistry and related health sciences shall be to provide for students of both sexes, on equal terms, all and every type of instruction in the various branches of medicine, dentistry, and related health sciences and to grant such degrees as are commonly granted by similar institutions.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.305. Prior: 1945 c 15 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4566-6. Formerly RCW 28.77.210.]